Illinois, session 104th, SB4113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs:9CENTRAL OFFICE10  For Personal Services.............................8,116,90011  For State Contributions to Social12   Security...........................................620,90013  For Operational Expenses of Central Office, 14   including prior years' costs.....................3,697,60015  For Expenses Related to the Security and Safety16   Enhancements at Illinois Veterans Homes..........1,050,00017  For Expenses Related to the Agency's Diversity, Equity,18   Inclusion, and Accessibility Initiatives...........300,00019    Total                                         $13,785,400 20    Section 10. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Facility 22Repair and Maintenance Fund to the Department of Veterans   SB4113- 2 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1Affairs for repairs, maintenance, and other permanent 2improvements. 3    Section 15. The sum of $796,200, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Department of Veterans Affairs for all costs associated 6with the Veterans Accountability Unit. 7    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the General 9Revenue Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the 10objects and purposes and in the amounts set forth as follows:11GRANTS-IN-AID12  For Warrior Assistance Program......................150,00013  For Bonus Payments to War Veterans14   and Peacetime Crisis Survivors.....................198,00015  For Providing Educational Opportunities for16   Children of Certain Veterans, as provided17   by law, including Prior Years' Claims..............500,00018  For Cartage and Erection of Veterans' Headstones,19   including Prior Years' Claims......................425,00020    Total                                          $1,273,000 21    Section 25. The sum of $3,500,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 23Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs for the payment of   SB4113- 3 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1scholarships to students who are dependents of Illinois 2resident military personnel declared to be prisoners of war, 3missing in action, killed or permanently disabled, as provided 4by law. 5    Section 30. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 7Veterans Assistance Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs 8for making grants, funding additional services, or conducting 9additional research projects relating to veterans' post 10traumatic stress disorder; veterans' homelessness; the health 11insurance cost of veterans; veterans' disability benefits, 12including but not limited to, disability benefits provided by 13veterans service organizations and veterans assistance 14commissions or centers; and the long-term care of veterans. 15    Section 35. The amount of $340,357, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 18made for such purpose in Article 68, Section 35 of Public Act 19104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Illinois 20Veterans Assistance Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs 21for making grants, funding additional services, or conducting 22additional research projects relating to veterans' post 23traumatic stress disorder; veterans' homelessness; the health 24insurance cost of veterans; veterans' disability benefits,   SB4113- 4 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1including but not limited to, disability benefits provided by 2veterans service organizations and veterans assistance 3commissions or centers; and the long-term care of veterans. 4    Section 40. The following named amount, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois 6Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the Department of Veterans 7Affairs for the object and purpose and in the amount set forth 8as follows:9  For Specially Adapted Housing for Veterans..........240,000 10    Section 45. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Military 12Family Relief Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs for 13the payment of benefits authorized under the Survivors 14Compensation Act. 15    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 17the Department of Veterans Affairs for objects and purposes 18hereinafter named:19VETERANS FIELD SERVICES20Payable from the General Revenue Fund:21  For Personal Services.............................6,317,20022  For State Contributions to23   Social Security....................................483,300  SB4113- 5 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1  For Operational Expenses of Veterans Field2   Services, including prior years' costs...........2,201,9003    Total                                          $9,002,400 4    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 6the Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named:8ILLINOIS VETERANS HOME AT ANNA9Payable from General Revenue Fund:10  For Personal Services.............................5,375,00011  For State Contributions to12   Social Security....................................411,20013  For Operational Expenses of Anna Veterans14   Home, including prior years' costs.................995,20015    Total                                          $6,781,40016Payable from Anna Veterans Home Fund:17  For Personal Services.............................1,719,20018  For State Contributions to the State19   Employees' Retirement System.......................747,10020  For State Contributions to21   Social Security....................................131,60022  For Operational Expenses of Anna Veterans23   Home, including prior years' costs...............4,709,30024  For Permanent Improvements...........................50,00025  For Refunds..........................................30,000  SB4113- 6 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1    Total                                          $7,387,200 2    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 4the Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and 5purposes hereinafter named:6ILLINOIS VETERANS HOME AT QUINCY7Payable from General Revenue Fund:8  For Personal Services............................25,308,1009  For State Contributions to10   Social Security..................................1,936,10011  For Operational Expenses of Quincy Veterans12   Home, including prior years' costs...............5,771,90013    Total                                         $33,016,10014Payable from Quincy Veterans Home Fund:15  For Personal Services............................21,336,40016  For Member Compensation..............................28,00017  For State Contributions to the State18   Employees' Retirement System.....................9,271,80019  For State Contributions to20   Social Security..................................1,632,30021  For Operational Expenses of Quincy Veterans22   Home, including prior years' costs..............17,635,20023  For Permanent Improvements..........................750,00024  For Refunds..........................................70,00025    Total                                         $50,723,700   SB4113- 7 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 3the Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and 4purposes hereinafter named:5ILLINOIS VETERANS HOME AT LASALLE6Payable from General Revenue Fund:7  For Personal Services............................10,093,9008  For State Contributions to Social Security..........772,2009  For Operational Expenses of LaSalle Veterans10   Home, including prior years' costs...............1,503,20011    Total                                         $12,369,30012Payable from LaSalle Veterans Home Fund:13  For Personal Services............................10,088,30014  For State Contributions to the State15   Employees' Retirement System.....................4,383,90016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security....................................771,80018  For Operational Expenses of LaSalle Veterans19   Home, including prior years' costs...............5,059,30020  For Permanent Improvements..........................250,00021  For Refunds..........................................30,80022    Total                                         $20,584,100 23    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to   SB4113- 8 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1the Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and 2purposes hereinafter named:3ILLINOIS VETERANS HOME AT MANTENO4Payable from General Revenue Fund:5  For Personal Services............................22,353,4006  For State Contributions to7   Social Security..................................1,710,1008  For Operational Expenses of Manteno Veterans9   Home, including prior years' costs...............5,580,80010    Total                                         $29,644,30011Payable from Manteno Veterans Home Fund:12  For Personal Services............................15,484,70013  For Member Compensation...............................5,00014  For State Contributions to the State15   Employees' Retirement System.....................6,728,90016  For State Contributions to17   Social Security..................................1,184,60018  For Operational Expenses of Manteno Veterans19   Home, including prior years' costs...............9,944,90020  For Permanent Improvements..........................500,00021  For Refunds.........................................100,00022    Total                                         $33,948,100 23    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 24thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 25the Department of Veterans Affairs for costs associated with   SB4113- 9 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1the operation of a program for homeless veterans at the 2Illinois Veterans Home at Manteno:3  Payable from General Revenue Fund...................968,8004  Payable from the Manteno5   Veterans Home Fund.................................201,5006    Total                                          $1,170,300 7    Section 80. The following named amount, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 9Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and purposes 10hereinafter named:11ILLINOIS VETERANS HOME AT CHICAGO12Payable from General Revenue Fund:13  For Operational Expenses of Chicago Veterans14   Home, including prior years' costs..............11,731,90015    Total                                         $11,731,90016Payable from the Illinois Veterans' Homes Fund:17  For Operational Expenses of Chicago Veterans18   Home, including prior years' costs..............13,591,30019  For Permanent Improvements..........................300,00020    Total                                         $13,891,300 21    Section 85. The following named amount, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 23Department of Veterans Affairs for the objects and purposes 24hereinafter named:  SB4113- 10 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b1STATE APPROVING AGENCY2Payable from GI Education Fund:3  For Operational Expenses of the State Approving4   Agency, including prior years' costs.............2,691,4005    Total                                          $2,691,400 6    Section 90. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Folds of Honor 8Foundation Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs for 9grants to aid in providing educational scholarships to 10military families. 11    Section 95. The sum of $936,289, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 13on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 14such purpose in Article 68, Section 90 of Public Act 104-0003, 15as amended, is reappropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 16the Department of Veterans Affairs for costs associated with 17dental care for veterans in the five state-run veterans homes. 18    Section 100. No contract shall be entered into or 19obligation incurred or any expenditure made from any 20appropriation herein made in Section 10 of this Article until 21after the purpose and amounts have been approved in writing by 22the Governor. 23    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1,   SB4113- 11 -OMB104 00213 DSF 10213 b12026.